North Carolina statutes. Chapter 150B. Administrative Procedure Act.
Article 2A. Rules.

Part 1. General Provisions.

§ 150B-18.
Scope and effect.

This Article applies to an agency’s exercise of its authority to adopt a rule. A rule is not valid unless it is adopted in substantial compliance with this Article. An agency shall not seek to implement or enforce against any person a policy, guideline, or other interpretive statement that meets the definition of a rule contained in G.S. 150B-2(8a) if the policy, guideline, or other interpretive statement has not been adopted as a rule in accordance with this Article.

History.

1991, c. 418, s. 1; 2011-398, s. 1; 2012-187, s. 2.

§ 150B-19.
Restrictions on what can be adopted as a rule.

An agency may not adopt a rule that does one or more of the following:

Implements or interprets a law unless that law or another law specifically authorizes the agency to do so.

Enlarges the scope of a profession, occupation, or field of endeavor for which an occupational license is required.

Imposes criminal liability or a civil penalty for an act or omission, including the violation of a rule, unless a law specifically authorizes the agency to do so or a law declares that violation of the rule is a criminal offense or is grounds for a civil penalty.

Repeats the content of a law, a rule, or a federal regulation. A brief statement that informs the public of a requirement imposed by law does not violate this subdivision and satisfies the “reasonably necessary” standard of review set in G.S. 150B-21.9(a)(3).

Establishes a fee or other charge for providing a service in fulfillment of a duty unless a law specifically authorizes the agency to do so or the fee or other charge is for one of the following:

A service to a State, federal, or local governmental unit.

A copy of part or all of a State publication or other document, the cost of mailing a document, or both.

A transcript of a public hearing.

A conference, workshop, or course.

Data processing services.

Allows the agency to waive or modify a requirement set in a rule unless a rule establishes specific guidelines the agency must follow in determining whether to waive or modify the requirement.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-398, s. 61.2, effective July 25, 2011.

History.

1973, c. 1331, s. 1; 1985, c. 746, s. 1; 1991, c. 418, s. 1; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 7.10(a); 2011-13, s. 1; 2011-398, s. 61.2.

§ 150B-19.1.
Requirements for agencies in the rule-making process.

In developing and drafting rules for adoption in accordance with this Article, agencies shall adhere to the following principles:

An agency may adopt only rules that are expressly authorized by federal or State law and that are necessary to serve the public interest.

An agency shall seek to reduce the burden upon those persons or entities who must comply with the rule.

Rules shall be written in a clear and unambiguous manner and must be reasonably necessary to implement or interpret federal or State law.

An agency shall consider the cumulative effect of all rules adopted by the agency related to the specific purpose for which the rule is proposed. The agency shall not adopt a rule that is unnecessary or redundant.

When appropriate, rules shall be based on sound, reasonably available scientific, technical, economic, and other relevant information. Agencies shall include a reference to this information in the notice of text required by G.S. 150B-21.2(c).

Rules shall be designed to achieve the regulatory objective in a cost-effective and timely manner.

Each agency subject to this Article shall conduct an annual review of its rules to identify existing rules that are unnecessary, unduly burdensome, or inconsistent with the principles set forth in subsection (a) of this section. The agency shall repeal any rule identified by this review.

Each agency subject to this Article shall post on its Web site, no later than the publication date of the notice of text in the North Carolina Register, all of the following:

The text of a proposed rule.

An explanation of the proposed rule and the reason for the proposed rule.

The federal certification required by subsection (g) of this section.

Instructions on how and where to submit oral or written comments on the proposed rule, including a description of the procedure by which a person can object to a proposed rule and subject the proposed rule to legislative review.

Any fiscal note that has been prepared for the proposed rule.If an agency proposes any change to a rule or fiscal note prior to the date it proposes to adopt a rule, the agency shall publish the proposed change on its Web site as soon as practicable after the change is drafted. If an agency’s staff proposes any such change to be presented to the rule-making agency, the staff shall publish the proposed change on the agency’s Web site as soon as practicable after the change is drafted.

Each agency shall determine whether its policies and programs overlap with the policies and programs of another agency. In the event two or more agencies’ policies and programs overlap, the agencies shall coordinate the rules adopted by each agency to avoid unnecessary, unduly burdensome, or inconsistent rules.

Each agency shall quantify the costs and benefits to all parties of a proposed rule to the greatest extent possible. Prior to submission of a proposed rule for publication in accordance with

G.S. 150B-21.2

, the agency shall review the details of any fiscal note prepared in connection with the proposed rule and approve the fiscal note before submission.

If the agency determines that a proposed rule will have a substantial economic impact as defined in G.S. 150B-21.4(b1), the agency shall consider at least two alternatives to the proposed rule. The alternatives may have been identified by the agency or by members of the public.

Whenever an agency proposes a rule that is purported to implement a federal law, or required by or necessary for compliance with federal law, or on which the receipt of federal funds is conditioned, the agency shall:

Prepare a certification identifying the federal law requiring adoption of the proposed rule. The certification shall contain a statement setting forth the reasons why the proposed rule is required by federal law. If all or part of the proposed rule is not required by federal law or exceeds the requirements of federal law, then the certification shall state the reasons for that opinion.

Post the certification on the agency Web site in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

Maintain a copy of the federal law and provide to the Office of State Budget and Management the citation to the federal law requiring or pertaining to the proposed rule.

Repealed by Session Laws 2014-120, s. 6(a), effective September 18, 2014, and applicable to proposed rules published on or after that date.

History.

2011-398, s. 2; 2012-187, s. 3; 2013-143, s. 1.1; 2014-120, s. 6(a).

§ 150B-19.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-413, s. 3(c). For effective date, see editor’s note.

History.

2011-398, s. 2; repealed by 2013-413, s. 3(c). For effective date, see editor’s note.

§ 150B-19.3.
Limitation on certain environmental rules.

An agency authorized to implement and enforce State and federal environmental laws may not adopt a rule for the protection of the environment or natural resources that imposes a more restrictive standard, limitation, or requirement than those imposed by federal law or rule, if a federal law or rule pertaining to the same subject matter has been adopted, unless adoption of the rule is required by one of the subdivisions of this subsection. A rule required by one of the following subdivisions of this subsection shall be subject to the provisions of G.S. 150B-21.3(b1) as if the rule received written objections from 10 or more persons under G.S. 150B-21.3(b2):

A serious and unforeseen threat to the public health, safety, or welfare.

An act of the General Assembly or United States Congress that expressly requires the agency to adopt rules.

A change in federal or State budgetary policy.

A federal regulation required by an act of the United States Congress to be adopted or administered by the State.

A court order.

For purposes of this section, “an agency authorized to implement and enforce State and federal environmental laws” means any of the following:

The Department of Environmental Quality created pursuant to G.S. 143B-279.1.

The Environmental Management Commission created pursuant to G.S. 143B-282.

The Coastal Resources Commission established pursuant to

G.S. 113A-104

.

The Marine Fisheries Commission created pursuant to G.S. 143B-289.51.

The Wildlife Resources Commission created pursuant to

G.S. 143-240

.

The Commission for Public Health created pursuant to

G.S. 130A-29

.

The Sedimentation Control Commission created pursuant to G.S. 143B-298.

The North Carolina Oil and Gas Commission created pursuant to G.S. 143B-293.1.

The Pesticide Board created pursuant to

G.S. 143-436

.

History.

2011-398, s. 2; 2012-143, s. 1(d); 2014-4, s. 4(c); 2014-120, s. 57; 2015-241, s. 14.30(u).

§ 150B-20.
Petitioning an agency to adopt a rule.

Petition. — A person may petition an agency to adopt a rule by submitting to the agency a written rule-making petition requesting the adoption. A person may submit written comments with a rule-making petition. If a rule-making petition requests the agency to create or amend a rule, the person must submit the proposed text of the requested rule change and a statement of the effect of the requested rule change. Each agency must establish by rule the procedure for submitting a rule-making petition to it and the procedure the agency follows in considering a rule-making petition. An agency receiving a rule-making petition shall, within three business days of receipt of the petition, send the proposed text of the requested rule change and the statement of the effect of the requested rule change to the Office of Administrative Hearings. The Office of Administrative Hearings shall, within three business days of receipt of the proposed text of the requested rule change and the statement of the effect of the requested rule change, distribute the information via its mailing list and publish the information on its Web site.

Time. — An agency must grant or deny a rule-making petition submitted to it within 30 days after the date the rule-making petition is submitted, unless the agency is a board or commission. If the agency is a board or commission, it must grant or deny a rule-making petition within 120 days after the date the rule-making petition is submitted.

Action. — If an agency denies a rule-making petition, it must send the person who submitted the petition a written statement of the reasons for denying the petition. If an agency grants a rule-making petition, it must inform the person who submitted the rule-making petition of its decision and must initiate rule-making proceedings. When an agency grants a rule-making petition, the notice of text it publishes in the North Carolina Register may state that the agency is initiating rule making as the result of a rule-making petition and state the name of the person who submitted the rule-making petition. If the rule-making petition requested the creation or amendment of a rule, the notice of text the agency publishes may set out the text of the requested rule change submitted with the rule-making petition and state whether the agency endorses the proposed text.

Review. — Denial of a rule-making petition is a final agency decision and is subject to judicial review under Article 4 of this Chapter. Failure of an agency to grant or deny a rule-making petition within the time limits set in subsection (b) is a denial of the rule-making petition.

Repealed by Session Laws 1996, Second Extra Session, c. 18, s. 7.10(b).

History.

1973, c. 1331, s. 1; 1985, c. 746, s. 1; 1991, c. 418, s. 1; c. 477, s. 2; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 7.10(b); 1997-34, s. 2; 2003-229, s. 1; 2017-211, s. 1(a).

§ 150B-21.
Agency must designate rule-making coordinator; duties of coordinator.

Each agency must designate one or more rule-making coordinators to oversee the agency’s rule-making functions. The coordinator shall serve as the liaison between the agency, other agencies, units of local government, and the public in the rule-making process. The coordinator shall report directly to the agency head.

The rule-making coordinator shall be responsible for the following:

Preparing notices of public hearings.

Coordinating access to the agency’s rules.

Screening all proposed rule actions prior to publication in the North Carolina Register to assure that an accurate fiscal note has been completed as required by G.S. 150B-21.4(b).

Consulting with the North Carolina Association of County Commissioners and the North Carolina League of Municipalities to determine which local governments would be affected by any proposed rule action.

Providing the North Carolina Association of County Commissioners and the North Carolina League of Municipalities with copies of all fiscal notes required by G.S. 150B-21.4(b), prior to publication in the North Carolina Register of the proposed text of a permanent rule change.

Coordinating the submission of proposed rules to the Governor as provided by

G.S. 150B-21.26

.

At the earliest point in the rule-making process and in consultation with the North Carolina Association of County Commissioners, the North Carolina League of Municipalities, and with samples of county managers or city managers, as appropriate, the rule-making coordinator shall lead the agency’s efforts in the development and drafting of any rules or rule changes that could:

Require any unit of local government, including a county, city, school administrative unit, or other local entity funded by or through a unit of local government to carry out additional or modified responsibilities;

Increase the cost of providing or delivering a public service funded in whole or in part by any unit of local government; or

Otherwise affect the expenditures or revenues of a unit of local government.

The rule-making coordinator shall send to the Office of State Budget and Management for compilation a copy of each final fiscal note prepared pursuant to G.S. 150B-21.4(b).

The rule-making coordinator shall compile a schedule of the administrative rules and amendments expected to be proposed during the next fiscal year. The coordinator shall provide a copy of the schedule to the Office of State Budget and Management in a manner proposed by that Office.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-398, s. 3, effective October 1, 2011, and applicable to rules adopted on or after that date.

History.

1991, c. 418, s. 1; 1995, c. 415, s. 1; c. 507, s. 27.8(v); 2000-140, s. 93.1(a); 2001-424, s. 12.2(b); 2011-398, s. 3.